Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7455.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-7.2-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-7.2 entitled "The
Education Equity and Property Tax Relief Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-7.2-6. Categorical programs, state funded expenses.
In addition to the foundation education aid provided pursuant to § 16-7.2-3, the permanent
foundation education-aid program shall provide direct state funding for:
(a) Excess costs associated with special education students. Excess costs are defined when
an individual special education student’s cost shall be deemed to be “extraordinary.” Extraordinary
costs are those educational costs that exceed the state-approved threshold based on an amount
above four times the core foundation amount (total of core instruction amount plus student success
amount). The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available
for distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school
districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding appropriated in any fiscal year;
and the department of elementary and secondary education shall also collect data on those
educational costs that exceed the state-approved threshold based on an amount above two (2), three
(3), and five (5) times the core foundation amount;
(b) Career and technical education costs to help meet initial investment requirements
needed to transform existing, or create new, comprehensive, career and technical education
programs and career pathways in critical and emerging industries and to help offset the higher-

than-average costs associated with facilities, equipment maintenance and repair, and supplies
necessary for maintaining the quality of highly specialized programs that are a priority for the state.
The department shall develop criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all career and technical
education funds as may be determined by the general assembly on an annual basis. The department
of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among
those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking
reimbursement exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;
(c) Programs to increase access to voluntary, free, high-quality pre-kindergarten programs.
The department shall recommend criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all early childhood
program funds as may be determined by the general assembly;
(d) Central Falls, Davies, and the Met Center Stabilization Fund is established to ensure
that appropriate funding is available to support their students. Additional support for Central Falls
is needed due to concerns regarding the city’s capacity to meet the local share of education costs.
This fund requires that education aid calculated pursuant to § 16-7.2-3 and funding for costs outside
the permanent foundation education-aid formula, including, but not limited to, transportation,
facility maintenance, and retiree health benefits shall be shared between the state and the city of
Central Falls. The fund shall be annually reviewed to determine the amount of the state and city
appropriation. The state’s share of this fund may be supported through a reallocation of current
state appropriations to the Central Falls school district. At the end of the transition period defined
in § 16-7.2-7, the municipality will continue its contribution pursuant to § 16-7-24. Additional
support for the Davies and the Met Center is needed due to the costs associated with running a
stand-alone high school offering both academic and career and technical coursework. The
department shall recommend criteria for the purpose of allocating any and all stabilization funds as
may be determined by the general assembly;
(e) Excess costs associated with transporting students to out-of-district non-public schools.
This fund will provide state funding for the costs associated with transporting students to out-of-
district non-public schools, pursuant to chapter 21.1 of this title. The state will assume the costs of
non-public out-of-district transportation for those districts participating in the statewide system.
The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for
distribution among those eligible school districts if the total approved costs for which school
districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal year;
(f) Excess costs associated with transporting students within regional school districts. This
fund will provide direct state funding for the excess costs associated with transporting students
within regional school districts, established pursuant to chapter 3 of this title. This fund requires
LC004167 - Page 2 of 6

that the state and regional school district share equally the student transportation costs net any
federal sources of revenue for these expenditures. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among those eligible school districts if
the total approved costs for which school districts are seeking reimbursement exceed the amount
of funding available in any fiscal year;
(g) Public school districts that are regionalized shall be eligible for a regionalization bonus
as set forth below:
(1) As used herein, the term “regionalized” shall be deemed to refer to a regional school
district established under the provisions of chapter 3 of this title, including the Chariho Regional
School district;
(2) For those districts that are regionalized as of July 1, 2010, the regionalization bonus
shall commence in FY 2012. For those districts that regionalize after July 1, 2010, the
regionalization bonus shall commence in the first fiscal year following the establishment of a
regionalized school district as set forth in chapter 3 of this title, including the Chariho Regional
School District;
(3) The regionalization bonus in the first fiscal year shall be two percent (2.0%) of the
state’s share of the foundation education aid for the regionalized district as calculated pursuant to
§§ 16-7.2-3 and 16-7.2-4 in that fiscal year;
(4) The regionalization bonus in the second fiscal year shall be one percent (1.0%) of the
state’s share of the foundation education aid for the regionalized district as calculated pursuant to
§§ 16-7.2-3 and 16-7.2-4 in that fiscal year;
(5) The regionalization bonus shall cease in the third fiscal year;
(6) The regionalization bonus for the Chariho regional school district shall be applied to
the state share of the permanent foundation education aid for the member towns; and
(7) The department of elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available
for distribution among those eligible regionalized school districts if the total, approved costs for
which regionalized school districts are seeking a regionalization bonus exceed the amount of
funding appropriated in any fiscal year;
(h) [Deleted by P.L. 2024, ch. 117, art. 8, § 1.]
(i) State support for school resource officers. For purposes of this subsection, a school
resource officer (SRO) shall be defined as a career law enforcement officer with sworn authority
who is deployed by an employing police department or agency in a community-oriented policing
assignment to work in collaboration with one or more schools. School resource officers should have
completed at least forty (40) hours of specialized training in school policing, administered by an
LC004167 - Page 3 of 6

accredited agency, before being assigned. Beginning in FY 2019, for a period of three (3) years,
school districts or municipalities that choose to employ school resource officers shall receive direct
state support for costs associated with employing such officers at public middle and high schools.
Districts or municipalities shall be reimbursed an amount equal to one-half (½) of the cost of
salaries and benefits for the qualifying positions. Funding will be provided for school resource
officer positions established on or after July 1, 2018, provided that:
(1) Each school resource officer shall be assigned to one school:
(i) Schools with enrollments below one thousand two hundred (1,200) students shall
require one school resource officer;
(ii) Schools with enrollments of one thousand two hundred (1,200) or more students shall
require two school resource officers;
(2) School resource officers hired in excess of the requirement noted above shall not be
eligible for reimbursement; and
(3) Schools that eliminate existing school resource officer positions and create new
positions under this provision shall not be eligible for reimbursement; and
(j) Additional state support for districts to provide for the mental and behavioral health of
students. The total additional amount to support the mental and behavioral health of students shall
be equal to two percent (2%) of the district’s total expenditures. All categorical funds distributed
pursuant to this subsection shall be used to hire and retain staff to provide high-quality, research-
based services to students to support their mental and behavioral health. Such staff shall include
school social workers, school counselors, school psychologists, paraprofessionals, behavioral
specialists, and registered behavior techs (RBTs). To be eligible for such funding, districts shall:
(1) Be below the industry-recommended ratios of one school social worker per two hundred
fifty (250) students, one school counselor per two hundred fifty (250) students, one school
psychologist per five hundred (500) students, and/or have elementary classrooms without a full-
time paraprofessional, behavior specialist, or RBT;
(2) Comply with all provisions of § 16-53.1-2; and
(3) Maintain policies, based on best practice, to ensure students removed from the
classroom with escalated behavior receive de-escalation support before returning to the classroom.
The department of elementary and secondary education shall collect performance reports from
districts and approve the use of funds prior to expenditure. The department of elementary and
secondary education shall ensure the funds are aligned to activities that are innovative and
expansive and not utilized for activities the district is currently funding. The department of
elementary and secondary education shall prorate the funds available for distribution among
LC004167 - Page 4 of 6

eligible recipients if the total calculated costs exceed the amount of funding available in any fiscal
year; and
(j)(k) Categorical programs defined in subsections (a) through (g) shall be funded pursuant
to the transition plan in § 16-7.2-7.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004167
========
LC004167 - Page 5 of 6